Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.289

Administrative dissolution—Reinstatement.

A limited liability company that has been administratively dissolved under RCW 23.95.610 may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement in accordance with RCW 23.95.615.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7115; 2015 c 188 s 56.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.